Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-155
County board; transaction of business; majority required.

When two only of the commissioners of the board shall attend, and shall be divided on any question, the decision thereof shall be deferred until the next meeting of the board, and then the matter shall be decided by a majority of the board.

Laws 1879, § 58, p. 370;

R.S.1913, § 983;

C.S.1922, § 883;

C.S.1929, § 26-137;

R.S.1943, § 23-155.